Georgia statutes. TITLE 12 CONSERVATION AND NATURAL RESOURCES
PART 2
H

ERITAGE TRUST PROGRAM

12-3-70. Short title.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the "Heritage Trust Act of 1975."

(Ga. L. 1975, p. 962, § 1.)

12-3-71. Legislative purpose.

The General Assembly finds that certain real property in Georgia, because it exhibits unique natural characteristics, special historical significance, or particular recreational value, constitutes a valuable heritage which should be available to all Georgians, now and in the future. The General Assembly further finds that much of this real property, because of Georgia's rapid progress over the past decade, has been altered, that its value as part of our heritage has been lost, and that such property which remains is in danger of being irreparably altered. The General Assembly declares, therefore, that there is an urgent public need to preserve important and endangered elements of Georgia's heritage, so as to allow present and future citizens to gain an understanding of their origins in nature and their roots in the culture of the past and to ensure a future sufficiency of recreational resources. The General Assembly asserts the public interest in the state's heritage by creating the Heritage Trust Program which shall be the responsibility of the Governor and the Department of Natural Resources and which shall seek to protect this heritage through the acquisition of fee simple title or lesser interests in valuable properties and by utilization of other available methods.

(Ga. L. 1975, p. 962, § 2.)

Cross references.

- Historic preservation generally, T. 44, C. 10.

Division of Archives and History, T. 45, C. 13, A. 3.

12-3-72. Definitions.

As used in this part, the term:

"Board" means the Board of Natural Resources.

"Heritage area" means an area of land, marsh, or water which has been identified by the board as having significant historical, natural, or cultural value.

"Heritage preserve" means a heritage area to which the state holds fee simple title or some lesser estate and which has been dedicated under this part.

(Ga. L. 1975, p. 962, § 4.)

12-3-73. Creation of Heritage Trust Commission; appointment and criteria for selection of members; terms of office; reimbursement of members for expenses; duties.

Reserved. Repealed by Ga. L. 2019, p. 919, § 4-1/HB 553, effective July 1, 2019.

Editor's notes.

- This Code section was based on Ga. L. 1975, p. 962,

§

3; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3,

§

12; Ga. L. 1983, p. 460,

§

1.

12-3-74. Powers and duties of board as to Heritage Trust Program.

The board shall have the following powers and duties with regard to the Heritage Trust Program:

To adopt and promulgate all policies, rules, and regulations necessary for the identification and acquisition of heritage areas and for the selection, dedication, management, and use of heritage preserves;

To acquire heritage areas in the name of the State of Georgia as otherwise provided by law;

To advocate and approve the dedication of heritage preserves; and

To provide general supervision and direction in the protection, management, operation, and use of heritage preserves.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code section, the board shall not have any power of purchase, condemnation, lease, agreement, gift, or devise which would have the effect of preventing, blocking, or in any manner hindering the construction of the Spewrell Bluff Dam Project authorized by P. L. 88-253, approved December 30, 1963.

(Ga. L. 1975, p. 962, § 5.)

Cross references.

- Historic preservation generally, T. 44, C. 10.

Division of Archives and History, T. 45, C. 13, A. 3.

Administrative Rules and Regulations.

- State parks and historic sites system, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Department of Natural Resources, Environmental Protection, Subject 391-5-1.

12-3-75. Dedication of property as a heritage preserve.

A heritage area which has been acquired by the Department of Natural Resources for the Heritage Trust Program may become dedicated as a heritage preserve after written recommendation of the board and approval by the Governor. Any other real property owned by the State of Georgia and under the custody of the department may be similarly dedicated. The written recommendation shall contain a provision which designates the best and most important use or uses to which the land is to be put. The dedication as a heritage preserve shall become effective when the written recommendation and the approval of the Governor are filed with the office of the Secretary of State. The written recommendation and the approval of the Governor shall be filed in the office of the clerk of the superior court of the county or counties in which the heritage preserve is located.

(Ga. L. 1975, p. 962, § 6.)

12-3-76. Use of heritage preserves; state authorized to transfer interest in heritage preserve property to county or local government upon certain conditions.

Heritage preserves shall be held by the state in trust for the benefit of the present and future generations of the people of the State of Georgia. Each heritage preserve shall be put to the designated use or uses which confer the best and most important benefit to the public. Heritage preserves shall not be put to any use other than the dedicated use or uses except pursuant to the following procedure:

A state agency, department, or authority with a direct interest in the use of a heritage preserve must submit in writing a petition to the board that an imperative and unavoidable necessity for such other use exists;

Upon receipt of such petition, the board shall give public hearing thereon in the county or counties in which the heritage preserve is located;

The board shall consider fully all testimony relative to the proposed use and submit a recommendation to the General Assembly; and

The General Assembly may then determine if such use is in the public interest and may by statute approve such other use of the heritage preserve.

The State of Georgia and the Department of Natural Resources may convey fee simple title in a property dedicated as a heritage preserve under Code Section 12-3-75 for good and valuable consideration as determined by the State Properties Commission to a willing county or local government pursuant to the following procedures:

The department shall submit a request in writing to the board to remove the heritage preserve dedication from the property and to convey the property to the county or local government, subject to the grant of a perpetual conservation easement to the State of Georgia and the department that is consistent with the best and most important uses established in the written recommendation and approval of the Governor dedicating the property as a heritage preserve and the conservation values identified by the department, as well as any other restrictions applicable to the property;

The board shall make a determination, after a public hearing, that the removal of the heritage preserve dedication from the property and its conveyance to the county or local government subject to a conservation easement is in the best interest of the State of Georgia;

The conveyance is approved by the General Assembly and the State Properties Commission; and

The department shall file with the Secretary of State and the office of the clerk of the superior court of the county or counties in which the property is located a notice of the removal of the heritage preserve dedication simultaneously with the recordation of the conservation easement in the real property records of the county or counties in which the property is located.

Nothing in this Code section shall be construed so as to give county or local governments the authority to assign their interests in property conveyed pursuant to subsection (b) of this Code section to a private individual or entity.

Nothing in this Code section shall be construed so as to compel a county or local government to accept conveyance of a heritage preserve, and no conveyance shall take place without the approval of the local governing authority.

In the event that a county or local government that is in receipt of property pursuant to this Code section determines that it is in the best interest of the county or local government, fee simple title to the property may, if approved by the department and the State Properties Commission, revert to the State of Georgia.

(Ga. L. 1975, p. 962, § 7; Ga. L. 2011, p. 672, § 1/HB 90.)

Cross references.

- Historic preservation generally, T. 44, C. 10.

Division of Archives and History, T. 45, C. 13, A. 3.

12-3-77. Effect on protected status of property of dedication or other action taken by board.

Neither the dedication of a piece of property as a heritage preserve nor any action taken by the board pursuant to this part shall operate to void, preempt, or dilute any protected status which that property had or would have had but for its dedication as a heritage preserve.

(Ga. L. 1975, p. 962, § 8.)